Utah statutes.
4-13-7.   Department to publish commercial values applied to components of
commercial fertilizer.
The department shall annually publish the values per unit of nitrogen,
available phosphoric acid, and soluble potash in commercial fertilizers in
this state for the purpose of notifying registrants of the commercial value to
be applied to commercial fertilizers under Section 4-13-6.
